Florida, session 2026, SB1012.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 25 26 Section 1.âParagraph (b) of subsection (3) of section 27 945.215, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 28 945.215âInmate welfare and employee benefit trust funds.â 29 (3)âCONTRACTOR-OPERATED INSTITUTIONS INMATE WELFARE TRUST 30 FUND; CONTRACTOR-OPERATED CORRECTIONAL FACILITIES.â 31 (b)1.âThe net proceeds derived from inmate canteens, 32 vending machines used primarily by inmates, telephone 33 commissions, and similar sources at contractor-operated 34 correctional facilities shall be deposited in the Contractor 35 Operated Institutions Inmate Welfare Trust Fund. 36 2.âMaintenance and repair deduction fees from contractor 37 operated correctional facilities shall be deposited in the 38 Contractor-Operated Institutions Inmate Welfare Trust Fund. 39 3.âFunds in the Contractor-Operated Institutions Inmate 40 Welfare Trust Fund shall be used exclusively to provide for or 41 to operate any of the following at contractor-operated 42 correctional facilities: 43 a.âPrograms to aid inmatesâ reintegration into society. 44 b.âEnvironmental health upgrades to facilities, including 45 fixed capital outlay for repairs and maintenance that would 46 improve environmental conditions of the correctional facilities. 47 4.2.âFunds in the Contractor-Operated Institutions Inmate 48 Welfare Trust Fund shall be expended only pursuant to 49 legislative appropriation. 50 Section 2.âEffective October 1, 2026, section 945.6041, 51 Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 52 945.6041âCompensation for inmate emergency and specialty 53 medical services.â 54 (1)âThe Legislature finds that the department relies on 55 community health care providers to provide emergency and 56 specialty medical services to incarcerated inmates which cannot 57 be provided by health care staff inside a state correctional 58 institution or facility. The Legislature further finds that the 59 department has experienced a substantial increase in inmate 60 health care costs. 61 (2)(1)âAs used in this section, the term: 62 (a)ââEmergency medical transportation servicesâ includes, 63 but is not limited to, services rendered by ambulances, 64 emergency medical services vehicles, and air ambulances as those 65 terms are defined in s. 401.23. 66 (a)(b)ââCommunity health care providerâ means: 67 1.âA hospital licensed under chapter 395. 68 2.âA physician or physician assistant licensed under 69 chapter 458. 70 3.âAn osteopathic physician or physician assistant licensed 71 under chapter 459. 72 4.âA podiatric physician licensed under chapter 461. 73 5.âAn autonomous advanced practice registered nurse 74 licensed under chapter 464. 75 6.5.âA health maintenance organization certificated under 76 part I of chapter 641. 77 7.6.âAn ambulatory surgical center licensed under chapter 78 395. 79 8.7.âA professional association, partnership, corporation, 80 joint venture, or other association established by the 81 individuals set forth in subparagraphs 2., 3., and 4. for 82 professional activity. 83 9.8.âAn other medical facility. 84 a.âAs used in this subparagraph, the term âother medical 85 facilityâ means: 86 (I)âA facility the primary purpose of which is to provide 87 human medical diagnostic services, or a facility providing 88 nonsurgical human medical treatment which discharges patients on 89 the same working day that the patients are admitted; and 90 (II)âA facility that is not part of a hospital. 91 b.âThe term does not include a facility existing for the 92 primary purpose of performing terminations of pregnancy, or an 93 office maintained by a physician or dentist for the practice of 94 medicine. 95 (b)ââEmergency medical conditionâ has the same meaning as 96 in s. 395.002(8). 97 (c)ââEmergency medical services and careâ means medical 98 screening, examination, and evaluation by a physician, or, to 99 the extent permitted by applicable law, by other appropriate 100 personnel under the supervision of a physician, to determine 101 whether an emergency medical condition exists and, if so, the 102 care, treatment, or surgery by a physician necessary to relieve 103 or eliminate the emergency medical condition, within the service 104 capability of the facility. 105 (d)ââEmergency medical transportation servicesâ includes, 106 but is not limited to, services rendered by ambulances, 107 emergency medical services vehicles, and air ambulances as those 108 terms are defined in s. 401.23. 109 (e)ââHospitalâ means any facility licensed under chapter 110 395. 111 (f)ââInmate medical servicesâ includes, but is not limited 112 to, all services rendered by a community health care provider to 113 an inmate, except emergency medical services and care provided 114 by a hospital. 115 (g)ââMedicaid allowable rateâ means the amount that the 116 Agency for Health Care Administration would reimburse a Medicaid 117 provider, as defined in s. 409.901, for Medicaid-covered 118 services delivered through the fee-for-service program. 119 (h)ââMedicare allowable rateâ means the amount set by the 120 Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services which Medicare will 121 pay for a specific covered service. 122 (i)ââSecure unitâ means a designated space, approved by the 123 department, where the department can safely and efficiently 124 manage and secure inmates receiving medical services from a 125 community health care provider. 126 (3)(2)âCompensation to a community health care provider for 127 the provision of to provide inmate medical services may not 128 exceed 110 percent of the relevant Medicare allowable rate if 129 the health care provider does not have a contract to provide 130 services with the department or the contractor-operated 131 correctional facility, as defined in s. 944.710, which houses 132 the inmate. However, a community health care provider is exempt 133 from this section and may negotiate compensation above 110 134 percent of the relevant Medicare allowable rate if the community 135 health care provider enters into an agreement with the 136 department, a comprehensive health care services vendor, or a 137 contractor-operated correctional facility, as defined in s. 138 944.710, to provide health care services to inmates in a secure 139 unit within the community health care providerâs medical 140 facility, within a correctional institution or facility, or by 141 telehealth in accordance with s. 456.47 if such inmates are 142 within the correctional institution or facility when they 143 receive medical services compensation to a health care provider 144 may not exceed 125 percent of the Medicare allowable rate if: 145 (a)âThe health care provider does not have a contract to 146 provide services with the department or the contractor-operated 147 correctional facility, as defined in s. 944.710, which houses 148 the inmate; and 149 (b)âThe health care provider reported a negative operating 150 margin for the previous year to the Agency for Health Care 151 Administration through hospital-audited financial data. 152 (4)âCompensation to a hospital for the provision of 153 emergency medical services and care provided to inmates may not 154 exceed 110 percent of the Medicare allowable rate. 155 (5)(3)âCompensation to an entity to provide emergency 156 medical transportation services for inmates may not exceed 110 157 percent of the Medicaid Medicare allowable rate if the entity 158 does not have a contract with the department or a contractor 159 operated correctional facility, as defined in s. 944.710, to 160 provide the services. 161 (6)(4)âThis section does not apply to charges for medical 162 services provided at a hospital operated by the department. 163 Section 3.âFor the purpose of incorporating the amendment 164 made by this act to section 945.215, Florida Statutes, in a 165 reference thereto, subsection (1) of section 944.72, Florida 166 Statutes, is reenacted to read: 167 944.72âContractor-Operated Institutions Inmate Welfare 168 Trust Fund.â 169 (1)âThere is hereby created in the Department of 170 Corrections the Contractor-Operated Institutions Inmate Welfare 171 Trust Fund. The purpose of the trust fund shall be the benefit 172 and welfare of inmates incarcerated in contractor-operated 173 correctional facilities under contract with the department 174 pursuant to this chapter or chapter 957. Moneys shall be 175 deposited in the trust fund and expenditures made from the trust 176 fund as provided in s. 945.215. 177 Section 4.âExcept as otherwise expressly provided in this 178 act, this act shall take effect July 1, 2026.